Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-313
Children under sixteen; dangerous, unhealthy, or immoral employment.

No child under the age of sixteen years shall be employed in any work which by reason of the nature of the work or place of performance is dangerous to life or limb or in which his or her health may be injured or his or her morals may be depraved. No parent, guardian, or other person, who has under his or her control any child, shall cause or permit such child to work or be employed in violation of this section.

Laws 1907, c. 66, § 13, p. 268;

R.S.1913, § 3587;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. III, § 13, p. 558;

C.S.1922, § 7681;

C.S.1929, § 48-313;

R.S.1943, § 48-313;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 281;

Laws 1987, LB 35, § 6.